Utah statutes.
75-5-201.   Status of guardian of minor -- General.
(1) (a)  A person becomes a guardian of a minor by acceptance of a
testamentary appointment, through appointment by a local school board under
Section 53A-2-202, or upon appointment by the court.
(b)  The guardianship status continues until terminated, without regard to the
location from time to time of the guardian and minor ward.
(2) (a)  A document issued by other than a court of law which purports to
award guardianship to a person who is not a legal resident of the jurisdiction
in which the guardianship is awarded is not valid in the state of Utah until
reviewed and approved by a Utah court.
(b)  The procedure for obtaining approval of a guardianship under Subsection
(2)(a) shall be identical to the procedure required under this part for
obtaining a court appointment of a guardian.
